Florida, session 2026, SB1516.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âSection 364.242, Florida Statutes, is created to 25 read: 26 364.242âMisleading or inaccurate caller identification.â 27 (1)âA person may not, in connection with a 28 telecommunications company, cause a caller identification 29 service as defined in s. 365.176 to knowingly transmit 30 misleading or inaccurate caller identification information with 31 the intent to defraud, cause harm, or wrongfully obtain anything 32 of value. 33 (2)âA telecommunications company must provide the telephone 34 number and location from which each telephone call originates 35 and must block all telephone calls and text messages that 36 contain manipulated caller identification information that does 37 not match such telephone number or location. 38 (3)âThis section does not apply to transmissions in 39 connection with: 40 (a)âAny authorized activity of a law enforcement agency; or 41 (b)âA court order that specifically authorizes manipulation 42 of caller identification information. 43 44 The commission shall determine additional exemptions from this 45 section as it deems appropriate. 46 (4)âA telecommunications company may be held civilly liable 47 and, notwithstanding s. 364.285(1), subject to a penalty of 48 $250,000 if it is found to be in violation of this section. 49 Section 2.âSection 364.243, Florida Statutes, is created to 50 read: 51 364.243âAuthentication framework implementation.â 52 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âSTIR/SHAKEN 53 authentication frameworkâ means the Secure Telephone Identity 54 Revisited (STIR) and Signature-based Handling of Asserted 55 Information Using toKENs (SHAKEN) standards proposed by the 56 information and communications technology industry. 57 (2)âBy July 1, 2027, the commission shall require every 58 telecommunications company to implement the STIR/SHAKEN 59 authentication framework or an alternative technology that 60 provides comparable or superior capability to verify and 61 authenticate caller identification information in the Internet 62 protocol networks of the telecommunications company. 63 (3)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a 64 telecommunications company shall file a certification with the 65 Federal Communications Commission that the companyâs traffic is 66 either digitally verified by the STIR/SHAKEN authentication 67 framework or subject to a compliant automated call mitigation 68 program. The company shall provide a copy of such certification 69 to the Attorney General or the commission upon request. 70 (4)âA telecommunications company may be held civilly liable 71 and, notwithstanding s. 364.285(1), subject to a penalty of 72 $250,000 if it is found to be in violation of this section. 73 Section 3.âPresent subsection (4) of section 365.176, 74 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5) and amended, 75 and a new subsection (4) is added to that section, to read: 76 365.176âFlorida Call-Blocking Act.â 77 (4)âUnder s. 364.242, providers must block calls that 78 contain manipulated caller identification information that does 79 not match the originating number or location of the call. 80 (5)(4)âFor purposes of blocking calls from certain 81 originating numbers as authorized and required in this section, 82 a provider may rely on caller identification service information 83 provided by the pooling administrator to determine the 84 originating number. 85 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.